Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-159
Application for vehicle identification number or distinguishing identification number; fee.

For each application for a metallic assigned vehicle identification number plate or other form of marking or identification under section 60-148, the fee shall be twenty dollars, which shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund.

Laws 2005, LB 276, § 59;

Laws 2006, LB 663, § 17.